District of Columbia statutes.
42-1108.01

Enforcement.

This chapter shall be enforced in accordance with the provisions of chapters 41, 42, 43 and 44 of Title 47, including criminal enforcement, imposition or abatement of penalties and interest, administration of this chapter, and collection of taxes imposed hereunder; provided, that the denial of an exemption applied for under authority of § 42-1102 shall be subject to the same notice and appeal provisions and procedures as set forth under § 47-1009 relating to the denial of a real property tax exemption applied for under authority of § 47-1002.

Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 13, Pub. L. 87-408, title III, § 308a
as added Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 9(c), 50 DCR 896
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 10(c) of the Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, Oct. 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 10(c) of the Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-228, Mar. 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 42-1108.01, see § 10(b) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 42-1108.01, see § 10(c) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 42-1108.01, see § 10(c) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).